Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 4. Contractual Benefits.

Sec. 21.84.201.
Benefits.

A society may provide the following contractual benefits in any form:

death benefits;

endowment benefits;

annuity benefits;

temporary or permanent health care benefits;

hospital, medical, or nursing benefits;

monument or tombstone benefits to the memory of deceased members; and

other benefits authorized for life and health insurers that are not inconsistent with this chapter.

A society shall specify in its rules those persons who may be issued, or covered by, the contractual benefits described in (a) of this section consistent with providing benefits to members and the members’ dependents. A society may provide benefits on the lives of children under the minimum age for adult membership upon application of an adult person.

History.

(§ 16 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Secs. 21.84.210,
21.84.220.
Benefit on lives of children; nonforfeiture, benefits, cash surrender values, certificate loans and other options. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.230.
Beneficiaries.

The owner of a benefit contract shall have the right at all times to change the beneficiary or beneficiaries in accordance with the laws or rules of the society unless the owner waives this right by specifically requesting in writing that the beneficiary designation be irrevocable. A society, by laws or rules, may limit the scope of beneficiaries and shall provide that a beneficiary may not have or obtain a vested interest in the proceeds of a certificate until the certificate has become due and payable in conformity with the provisions of the benefit contract.

A society may make provision for the payment of funeral benefits to the extent of the portion of a payment under a certificate which might reasonably appear to be due to a person equitably entitled thereto by reason of having incurred expense occasioned by the burial of the member, but the portion paid may not exceed the sum of $500.

If, at the death of a person insured under a benefit contract, there is no lawful beneficiary to whom the proceeds are payable, the amount of the benefits, except to the extent that funeral benefits may be paid as provided in (b) of this section, shall be payable to the estate of the deceased insured the same as other property not exempt, but, if the owner of the certificate is not the insured, the amount of the benefits shall be payable to the owner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 17, 18 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.240.
Benefits not attachable.

Money or other benefit, charity, relief, or aid to be paid, provided, or rendered by a society is not liable to attachment, garnishment, or other process, or to be seized, taken, appropriated, or applied by a legal or equitable process or operation of law to pay a debt or liability of a member or beneficiary, or any other person who may have a right, either before or after payment by the society.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.84.250.
No personal liability. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.255.
The benefit contract.

A society authorized to do business in this state shall issue to each owner of a benefit contract a certificate specifying the amount of benefits provided under the contract. The certificate, together with any riders or endorsements attached to it, the laws of the society, the application for membership, the application for insurance, and the declaration of insurability, if any, signed by the applicant, and all amendments to each constitute the benefit contract, as of the date of issuance, between the society and the owner, and the certificate must so state. A copy of the application for insurance and declaration of insurability, if any, shall be endorsed upon or attached to the certificate. All statements on the application shall be representations and not warranties. A waiver of this provision is void.

Except as provided in AS

21.84.320(d)(3)

, changes, additions, or amendments to the laws of the society enacted subsequent to the issuance of the certificate shall bind the owner and the beneficiaries and shall govern and control the benefit contract in all respects as though the changes, additions, or amendments were made before and were in force at the time of the application for insurance, except that a change, addition, or amendment may not destroy or diminish benefits that the society contracted to give the owner as of the date of issuance.

A person upon whose life a benefit contract is issued before the person attains the age of majority is bound by the terms of the application and certificate and by all the laws and rules of the society to the same extent as though the age of majority were attained at the time of application.

Except as provided in AS

21.84.320(d)(3)

, a society shall provide in its laws that if the society’s reserves as to a class of certificates become impaired, the society’s board of directors or corresponding body may require that the owner shall pay to the society the amount of the owner’s equitable proportion of the deficiency as determined by its board and that, if the payment is not made, (1) the amount shall stand as an indebtedness against the certificate and shall draw interest not to exceed the rate specified for certificate loans under the certificates, or (2) in place of or in combination with the provisions of (1) of this subsection, the owner may accept a proportionate reduction in benefits under the certificate. The society may specify the manner of the election and the alternative that is to be presumed if no election is made.

Copies of the documents mentioned in this section, certified by the secretary or corresponding officer of the society, shall be received in evidence of the terms and conditions of the document.

A certificate may not be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless a copy of the form has been filed with the director in the manner provided for similar policies issued by life and health insurers in this state. A filing is considered approved unless disapproved within 60 days after the date of filing. A life, accident, health, or disability insurance certificate and an annuity certificate issued on or after one year after January 1, 1998, must meet the standard contract provision requirements not inconsistent with this chapter for similar policies issued by life and health insurers in this state, except that a society may provide in a certificate for a grace period for payment of premiums of one full month. The certificate must also contain a provision stating the amount of premiums that are payable under the certificate and a provision reciting or setting out the substance of sections of the society’s laws or rules in force at the time of issuance of the certificate that, if violated, will result in the termination or reduction of benefits payable under the certificate. If the laws of the society provide for expulsion or suspension of a member, the certificate must also contain a provision that any member expelled or suspended, except for nonpayment of a premium or within the contestable period for material misrepresentation in the application for membership or insurance, is entitled to maintain the certificate in force by continuing payment of the required premium.

A benefit contract issued on the life of a person below the society’s minimum age for adult membership may provide for transfer of control of ownership to the insured at an age specified in the certificate. A society may require approval of an application for membership in order to effect this transfer and may provide in all other respects for the regulation, government, and control of those certificates and all rights, obligations, and liabilities incident to and connected with those certificates. Ownership rights before transfer shall be specified in the certificate.

A society may specify the terms and conditions on which benefit contracts may be assigned.

History.

(§ 19 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For filing procedure for forms, rates, manuals, rating plans, and rules, see 3 AAC 31, art. 2.

Sec. 21.84.260.
The contract. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 21.84.265.
Nonforfeiture benefits, cash surrender values, certificate loans, and other options.

For certificates issued before one year after the January 1, 1998, the value of a paid-up nonforfeiture benefit and the amount of a cash surrender value, loan, or other option granted shall comply with the provisions of law applicable on December 31, 1997.

For certificates issued on or after January 1, 1999 for which reserves are computed on the Commissioner’s 1941 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, the Commissioner’s 1941 Standard Industrial Table, the Commissioner’s 1958 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, the Commissioner’s 1980 Standard Mortality Table, or a more recent table made applicable to life insurers, a paid-up nonforfeiture benefit and the amount of a cash surrender value, loan, or other option granted may not be less than the corresponding amount based on the interest rate and mortality tables authorized by the laws of this state for the calculation of those benefits by life and health insurers issuing policies containing similar benefits based upon these tables.

History.

(§ 20 ch 96 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.84.270.
Standard provisions. [Repealed, § 36 ch 96 SLA 1997.]